North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
SCHEDULE

to 25. 1 to 25. [Repealed]

Repealed by art. amd. 100, approved September 5, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 607, § 1; 1979, ch. 691). See notes on these sections in the Schedule printed following the renumbered constitution.

Section 26.

See the Schedule printed following the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLES

IN ADDITION TO AND AMENDMENT OF THE CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA

ARTICLE 1

See Article XI, § 25 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 2

The first section of this article amended section 121 and the second section amended section 127 of the constitution. See Article V, §§ 121 and 127 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 3

This article amended section 76 of the constitution. See Article V, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 4

This article amended section 179 of the constitution. See Article X, § 4 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 5

This article amended the fifth subdivision of section 215 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 12 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 6

This article amended the eighth subdivision of section 215 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 12 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 7

This article amended section 176 of the constitution. See Article X, § 5 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 7A

This article amended section 162 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 162 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 8

This article amended section 162 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 162 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 9

This article amended section 158 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 10

This article constituted section 89 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 89 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 11

This article amended section 158 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 12

This article amended section 216 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 13 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 13

This article amended section 158 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 14

See Article X, § 19 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 15

This article amended section 25 of the constitution. See Article II, § 25 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 16

This article amended section 202 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 45 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 17

This article amended section 216 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 13 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 18

This article amended section 185 of the constitution. See Article X, § 18 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 19

See Article X, § 20 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 20

The first section of this article amended section 176 and the second section amended section 179 of the constitution. See Article X, §§ 3 and 4 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 21

This article and article 22 of the amendments to the constitution were adopted at the same time and amended section 216 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 13 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 22

This article and article 21 of the amendments to the constitution were adopted at the same time and amended section 216 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 13 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 23

This article amended section 135 of the constitution. See Article XII, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 24

See Article X, § 9 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 25

This article amended section 89 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 89 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 26

This article amended section 25 of the constitution. See Article II, § 25 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 27

This article amended section 67 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 41 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 28

This article amended section 202 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 45 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 29

This article amended section 176 of the constitution. See Article X, § 5 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 30

This article amended section 177 of the constitution. See Article X, § 7 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 31

This article amended section 182 of the constitution. See Article X, § 13 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 32

This article amended section 185 of the constitution. See Article X, § 18 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 33

This article, approved March 16, 1920 (S.L. 1919, p. 111), was repealed by art. amd. 105, approved November 7, 1978, effective January 1, 1979 (S.L. 1977, ch. 613, §§ 3 and 4; 1979, ch. 696). (See Article III, §§ 1 to 10 of the renumbered constitution.)

The article as originally adopted read:

The qualified electors of the state or of any county, or of any congressional, judicial or legislative district may petition for the recall any elective congressional, state, county, judicial or legislative officer by filing a petition with the officer
with whom the petition for nomination to such office in the primary election is filed, demanding the recall of such officer. Such petition shall be signed by at least thirty percent of the qualified electors who voted at the preceding
election for the office of Governor in the state, county or district from which such officer is to be recalled. The officer with whom such petition is filed shall call a special election to be held not less than forty or more than
forty-five days from the filing of such petition.

The officer against whom such petition has been filed shall continue to perform the duties of his office until the result of such special election shall have been officially declared. Other candidates for such office may be nominated in the manner as
is provided by law in primary elections. The candidate who shall receive the highest number of votes shall be deemed elected for the remainder of the term. The name of the candidate against whom the recall petition is filed shall go
on the ticket unless he resigns within ten days after the filing of the petition. After one such petition and special election, no further recall petition shall be filed against the same officer during the term for which he was elected.
This article shall be self executing and all of its provisions shall be treated as mandatory. Laws may be enacted to facilitate its operation, but no law shall be enacted to hamper, restrict or impair the right of recall.

ARTICLE 34

This article amended section 161 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 8 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 35

This article amended section 183 of the constitution. See Article X, § 15 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 36

This article, approved March 16, 1920 (S.L. 1919 Sp., ch. 28), was repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695).

The article as originally adopted read:

Every qualified elector who shall have resided in the state one year, and in the county ninety days, and in the precinct thirty days next preceding any election, shall be entitled to vote at such election; provided, that where a qualified elector moves
from one precinct to another within the same county, he shall be entitled to vote in the precinct from which he moved, until he establishes his residence in the precinct to which he moved.

ARTICLE 37

This article amended section 121 of the constitution. See Article V, § 121 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 38

This article amended section 215 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 12 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 39

This article amended section 162 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 162 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 40

This article, approved June 28, 1922 (S.L. 1921, ch. 41, p. 79), was repealed by art. amd. 69, approved June 24, 1958 (S.L. 1957, ch. 402; 1959, ch. 431) and by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695). The article
as originally adopted read:

North Dakota: Every qualified elector, who shall have resided in the state one year, in the county ninety days and in the precinct thirty days next preceding any election, shall be entitled to vote at such election. Provided that where a qualified elector
moves from one precinct to another within the state he shall be entitled to vote in the precinct from which he moves until he establishes his residence in the precinct to which he moves.

ARTICLE 41

This article amended section 173 of the constitution. See Article VII, § 8 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 42

This article amended section 182 of the constitution. See Article X, § 13 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 43

This article amended section 82 of the constitution. See Article V, § 12 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 44

This article amended section 179 of the constitution. See Article X, § 4 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 45

This article amended section 104 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 104 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 46

This article amended section 90 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 90 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 47

This article repealed section 217 of the constitution. See Article XX, § 217 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 48

This article amended section 173 of the constitution. See Article VII, § 8 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 49

This article amended section 63 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 37 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 50

This article amended section 158 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 51

See Article IV, § 18 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 52

This article amended section 82 of the constitution. See Article V, § 11 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 53

This article amended section 186 of the constitution. See Article X, § 12 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 54

See Article VIII, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 55

This article amended sections 167, 170, 172 and 173, and repealed section 171 of the constitution. See Article VII, §§ 3, 6, 7 and 8 of the renumbered constitution and Article X, § 171 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 56

See Article X, § 11 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 57

This article amended section 82 of the constitution. See Article V, § 12 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 58

This article amended section 158 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 59

This article, approved June 29, 1948 (S.L. 1947, ch. 123; 1949, p. 510), was repealed by art. amd. 102, approved September 5, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 603, § 1; 1979, ch. 693). The article as originally adopted read:

The legislative assembly of the state of North Dakota is hereby authorized and empowered to provide by legislation for the issuance, sale, and delivery of the bonds of the state of North Dakota in the principal amount of not to exceed $27,000,000.00,
the proceeds thereof to be used in the payment of adjusted compensation to North Dakota veterans of World War II on the basis of term of service, and under such terms and conditions as the legislative assembly may prescribe.

ARTICLE 60

See Article X, § 10 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 61

This article amended section 162 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 162 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 62

This article amended section 173 of the constitution. See Article VII, § 8 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 63

This article amended the second subdivision of section 216 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 13 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 64

This article amended section 138 of the constitution. See Article XII, § 9 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 65

This article, approved June 26, 1956 (S.L. 1957, ch. 396), was repealed by art. amd. 102, approved September 5, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 603, § 1; 1979, ch. 693). The article as originally adopted read:

The legislative assembly of the state of North Dakota is hereby authorized and empowered to provide by legislation for the issuance, sale and delivery of the bonds of the state of North Dakota in the principal amount not to exceed $9,000,000.00, the proceeds
thereof to be used in payment of adjusted compensation to North Dakota veterans of the Korean conflict who served in the armed forces of the United States or any of its allies during the period from June 25, 1950 to July 27, 1953 on
the basis of terms of service, and under such terms and conditions as the legislative assembly may prescribe.

ARTICLE 66

This article amended section 14 of the constitution. See Article I, § 16 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 67

This article amended section 173 of the constitution. See Article VII, § 8 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 68

This article amended the second paragraph of section 203 of the constitution. See Article XIII, § 1 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 69

This article amended section 121 of the constitution and repealed article 40 of the amendments to the constitution. See Article V, § 21 and art. amd. 40 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 70

This article amended sections 82, 83, and 84 of the constitution. See Article V, §§ 12, 13 and 14 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 71

This article amended section 155 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 5 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 72

This article amended sections 26, 29, and 35 of the constitution. The article was held unconstitutional. See the notes following Article IV, §§ 2, 5 and 11 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 73

This article amended article 56 of the amendments to the constitution. See Article X, § 11 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 74

This article amended section 215 of the constitution. See Article IX, § 12 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 75

See Article II, § 7 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 76

See Article X, § 14 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 77

This article amended section 173 of the constitution. See Article VII, § 8 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 78

This article amended subdivision (d) of subsection 6 of article 54 of the amendments to the constitution. See Article VIII, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 79

This article amended section 113 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 113 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 80

This article amended sections 71, 82 and 150 of the constitution. A final paragraph of the article provided: “This amendment shall be self executing, but legislation may be enacted to facilitate its operation.” See Article V, §§ 1 and 12 and Article VII,
§ 9 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 81

This article repealed the tenth paragraph of section 25 of the constitution. See Article II, § 25 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 82

This article amended section 175 of the constitution. See Article X, § 3 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 83

This article amended section 150 of the constitution. See Article VII, § 9 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 84

This article amended section 130 of the constitution. See Article VII, § 1 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 85

This article amended section 148 of the constitution. See Article VIII, § 2 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 86

This article amended sections 41, 53 and 56 of the constitution. See Article IV, §§ 16, 22 and 23 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 87

This article, approved September 1, 1970 (S.L. 1969, ch. 592, § 1; 1971, ch. 616, § 1), was repealed by art. amd. 102, approved September 5, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 603, § 1; 1979, ch. 693). The article as originally adopted read:

The legislative assembly of the state of North Dakota is hereby authorized and empowered to provide by legislation for the issuance, sale, and delivery of bonds of the state of North Dakota in such principal amounts as determined by the legislative assembly
to be necessary for the payment of adjusted compensation to North Dakota veterans of the Vietnam conflict. Such adjusted compensation shall be paid from the proceeds of the bonds at rates equal to the rates provided by law for adjusted
compensation paid by the state of North Dakota to veterans of World War II and the Korean conflict on the basis of terms of service and such other terms and conditions as the legislative assembly may provide. Grants or stipends paid
pursuant to law by the state of North Dakota to any veteran for educational assistance shall be deducted from the adjusted compensation otherwise payable to such veteran.

ARTICLE 88

This article, approved September 1, 1970 (S.L. 1969, ch. 595, § 1; 1971, ch. 617, § 1), was repealed by art. amd. 102, approved September 5, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 603, § 1; 1979, ch. 693). The article as originally adopted read:

A constitutional convention shall be called for the purpose of proposing a new Constitution, or revision or amendment of the existing Constitution. Such convention shall be called and conducted, and delegates thereto shall be chosen in the manner provided
by law.

A constitutional convention called by a majority affirmative vote on this question shall be called and conducted as provided by law, and the proposed revision or amendment of the Constitution resulting from such shall be submitted by such convention directly
to the people of North Dakota for approval or disapproval at the statewide special election called by the governor as provided by law.

The second constitutional convention convened on January 3, 1972, and adopted a proposed new constitution on February 17, 1972. The 1972 constitution was disapproved by the electors on April 28, 1972. See chapter 529, 1973 S.L., for the full text of the
1972 constitution.

ARTICLE 89

This article amended sections 153 and 156 and repealed sections 159 and 162 of the constitution. See Article IX, §§ 1 and 3 of the renumbered constitution and Article IX, §§ 159 and 162 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 90

This article amended section 216 of the constitution and subsection 1 of article 54 of the amendments to the constitution. See Article IX, § 13 and Article VIII, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 91

This article amended section 7 of the constitution. See Article I, § 13 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 92

See Article XI, § 5 of the renumbered constitution.

Section 2 of this article amended section 50 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 28 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 93

The first section of this article amended section 74 and the second section amended section 77 of the constitution. See Article V, §§ 4 and 7 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 94

See Article VI, § 12.1 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 95

This article amended sections 53 and 56 and repealed section 55 of the constitution. See Article IV, §§ 22 and 23 of the renumbered constitution and Article II, § 55 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 96

This article amended sections 28 and 34 of the constitution. See Article IV, §§ 4 and 10 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 97

This article repealed original Article IV of the constitution (consisting of sections 85 through 120) and created a new Article IV (consisting of sections 85 through 97). See Article IV in this Appendix and Article VI of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 98

See Article XI, § 25 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 99

See Article VIII, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 100

This article repealed section 214 of Article XVII and sections 1 through 25 of the transition schedule of the constitution. See Article XVII, § 214 in this Appendix and the transition schedule at the end of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 101

This article amended sections 65 and 77 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 39 and Article V, § 7 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 102

This article repealed articles 59, 65, 87, and 88 of the amendments to the constitution. See notes following these articles in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 103

See Article XI, § 6 of the renumbered constitution.

ARTICLE 104

This article repealed original Article V of the constitution (consisting of sections 121 through 129) and created a new Article V (consisting of sections 121 and 122). The article repealed articles 36 and 40 of the amendments to the constitution. See
Article V in this Appendix and Article II of the renumbered constitution. See also notes following articles of amendment 36 and 40 in this Appendix.

ARTICLE 105

Section 1.

See Article III, §§ 1 to 10, of the renumbered constitution.

Section 2.

This section amended section 202 of the constitution. See Article IV, § 45 of the renumbered constitution.

Section 3.

This section repealed section 25 of the constitution and article 33 of the amendments to the constitution. See Article II, § 25 and article of amendment 33 in this Appendix.

Section 4.

This section provided that article 105 was to become effective on January 1, 1979.